Utah statutes.
76-10-707.   False reports.

Every director, officer, or agent of any corporation or joint stock association who knowingly makes or concurs in making or publishing any written report, exhibit, or statement of its affairs or pecuniary condition, containing any material statement which is false is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

